Washington statutes.
RCW 42.12.020

Resignations, to whom made.

Resignations shall be made as follows: By the state officers and members of the legislature, to the governor; by all county officers, to the county commissioners of their respective counties; by all other officers, holding their offices by appointment, to the body, board or officer that appointed them.

[Code 1881 s 3062; 1865 p 28 s 1; RRS s 9949.]

NOTES:

Appointments to fill vacancies: State Constitution Art. 2 s 15 (Amendment 32).